Alaska statutes. Title 47. Welfare, Social Services, and Institutions.
Article 3. Senior Benefits Payment Program.

Cross references. —

For a statement of legislative intent applicable to the program described in AS

47.45.301

—

47.45.309

, see § 1, ch. 1, FSSLA 2007, in the 2007 Temporary and Special Acts.
For provisions limiting eligibility for payments under the program described in AS

47.45.301

—

47.45.309

by a person receiving cash assistance or a prescription drug benefit under a separate state senior benefit program, see § 5, ch. 1, FSSLA 2007, in the 2007 Temporary and Special Acts.

Sec. 47.45.300.
Senior care program. [Repealed, § 4 ch 89 SLA 2005.]

Sec. 47.45.301.
Alaska senior benefits payment program.

The Alaska senior benefits payment program is established in the Department of Health and Social Services to provide cash benefits as far as practicable under appropriations provided by law.

The department shall administer the program and adopt regulations under AS 44.62 (Administrative Procedure Act) to carry out the purposes of the program.

If the department estimates that appropriations for the program are insufficient to meet the demands of the program in a fiscal year, the department may reduce or eliminate the cash benefit available to recipients.

History.

(§ 3 ch 1 FSSLA 2007)

Delayed repeal of section. —

Under § 4,
ch. 1, FSSLA 2007, as amended by § 5,
ch. 6, SLA 2011, §
1, ch. 113, SLA 2014, and sec. 1, ch. 8, SLA 2018, this section is repealed June 30, 2024.

Revisor’s notes. —

Section 4,
ch. 1, FSSLA 2007, provided that
AS

09.38.015(a)(11)

, this section,
AS

47.45.302

,

47.45.304

,

47.45.306

,

47.45.308

, and

47.45.309

would be repealed effective June 30, 2011.
Under Sec. 5,
ch. 6, SLA 2011, the date of the repeal was extended to June 30, 2015 (this date was later amended to June 30, 2018). However, the effective date of Sec. 5,
ch. 6, SLA 2011 was July 31, 2011.
Under sec. 1, ch. 8, SLA 2018, the date of the repeal was again extended to June 30, 2024.
However, the effective date of sec. 1, ch. 8, SLA 2018, was August 8, 2018.
The legal effect of sec. 5, ch. 6, SLA 2011, and sec. 1, ch. 8, SLA 2018, is uncertain. See
AS

01.10.090

and

01.10.100

for law concerning retroactivity and the effect of repeals and amendments.

Administrative Code. —

For senior benefits program, see 7 AAC 47, art. 3.

Sec. 47.45.302.
Cash assistance benefit.

An individual is eligible for a cash assistance benefit under the program if the individual

is 65 years of age or older;

is a resident of the state;

is a citizen of the United States or a qualified alien under 8 U.S.C. 1613 and 1641;

has a household income that does not exceed 175 percent of the annual federal poverty line for Alaska, as determined by the United States Department of Health and Human Services and revised under 42 U.S.C. 9902(2);

has not received a longevity bonus payment under AS

47.45.010

-

47.45.160

for the same period; and

applies in the format prescribed by the department; the department may use an abbreviated form for an individual who received a payment under an assistance program for seniors that paid $120 a month and was administered by the department on or before July 29, 2007.

An eligible individual shall receive a monthly cash assistance payment beginning on August 1, 2007, as follows:

$250 if the individual’s household income does not exceed 75 percent of the federal poverty line for Alaska;

$175 if the individual’s household income does not exceed 100 percent but is above 75 percent of the federal poverty line for Alaska;

$125 if the individual’s household income does not exceed 175 percent but is above 100 percent of the federal poverty line for Alaska.

Cash assistance provided under this section is subject to appropriation.

History.

(§ 3 ch 1 FSSLA 2007; am § 1 ch 11 SLA 2016)

Delayed repeal of section. —

Under sec. 4, ch. 1, FSSLA 2007, as amended by sec. 5, ch. 6, SLA 2011, sec. 1, ch. 113, SLA 2014, and sec. 1, ch. 8, SLA 2018, this section is repealed June 30, 2024.

Revisor’s notes. —

Section 4,
ch. 1, FSSLA 2007, provided that
AS

09.38.015(a)(11)

,
AS

47.45.301

, this section,

47.45.304

,

47.45.306

,

47.45.308

, and

47.45.309

would be repealed effective June 30, 2011.
Under Sec. 5,
ch. 6, SLA 2011, the date of the repeal was extended to June 30, 2015 (this was later amended to June 30, 2018). However, the effective date of Sec. 5,
ch. 6, SLA 2011 was July 31, 2011.
Under sec. 1, ch. 8, SLA 2018, the date of the repeal was again extended to June 30, 2024.
However, the effective date of sec. 1, ch. 8, SLA 2018, was August 8, 2018.
The legal effect of sec. 5, ch. 6, SLA 2011, and sec. 1, ch. 8, SLA 2018, is uncertain. See
AS

01.10.090

and

01.10.100

for law concerning retroactivity and the effect of repeals and amendments.

In 2007, “or on the effective date of this Act, whichever is later,” was deleted from subsection (b) because the effective date of ch. 1, FSSLA 2007, was July 29, 2007.

Cross references. —

For federal poverty guidelines, see https://aspe.hhs.gov/poverty-guidelines.

For governor's transmittal letter for ch. 11, SLA 2016, see 2016 Senate Journal 1614 — 1615.

Administrative Code. —

For senior benefits program, see 7 AAC 47, art. 3.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2016 amendment, effective July 1, 2016, in (a), added (3), and made related and stylistic changes.

Sec. 47.45.304.
Continuation of benefits.

An eligible individual who leaves the state may not receive a cash benefit under AS

47.45.302

during the absence unless the individual’s absence is temporary and is for one of the following reasons:

to receive medical treatment for the individual;

to accompany the individual’s family member who is receiving medical treatment outside the state; or

for a vacation, business trip, or other absence of less than 30 consecutive days, unless the individual has applied for and received a time extension from the department for special circumstances.

History.

(§ 3 ch 1 FSSLA 2007)

Delayed repeal of section. —

Under sec. 4, ch. 1, FSSLA 2007, as amended by sec. 5, ch. 6, SLA 2011, sec. 1, ch. 113, SLA 2014, and sec. 1, ch. 8, SLA 2018, this section is repealed June 30, 2024.

Revisor’s notes. —

Section 4,
ch. 1, FSSLA 2007, provided that
AS

09.38.015(a)(11)

,
AS

47.45.301

,

47.45.302

, this section,

47.45.306

,

47.45.308

, and

47.45.309

would be repealed effective June 30, 2011.
Under Sec. 5,
ch. 6, SLA 2011, the date of the repeal was extended to June 30, 2015 (this date was later amended to June 30, 2018). However, the effective date of Sec. 5,
ch. 6, SLA 2011 was July 31, 2011.
Under sec. 1, ch. 8, SLA 2018, the date of the repeal was again extended to June 30, 2024.
However, the effective date of sec. 1, ch. 8, SLA 2018, was August 8, 2018.
The legal effect of sec. 5, ch. 6, SLA 2011, and sec. 1, ch. 8, SLA 2018, is uncertain. See
AS

01.10.090

and

01.10.100

for law concerning retroactivity and the effect of repeals and amendments.

Administrative Code. —

For senior benefits program, see 7 AAC 47, art. 3.

Sec. 47.45.306.
Appeal rights.

An individual who receives a determination from the department that denies, limits, or modifies a cash benefit under AS

47.45.301

—

47.45.309

, other than a determination under AS

47.45.301(c)

to reduce or eliminate benefits, may request a hearing before the office of administrative hearings (AS

44.64.010

) under regulations adopted by the department.

History.

(§ 3 ch 1 FSSLA 2007; am E.O. No. 116, § 14 (2012))

Delayed repeal of section. —

Under sec. 4, ch. 1, FSSLA 2007, as amended by sec. 5, ch. 6, SLA 2011, sec. 1, ch. 113, SLA 2014, and sec. 1, ch. 8, SLA 2018, this section is repealed June 30, 2024.

Revisor’s notes. —

Section 4,
ch. 1, FSSLA 2007, provided that
AS

09.38.015(a)(11)

,
AS

47.45.301

,

47.45.302

,

47.45.304

, this section,

47.45.308

, and

47.45.309

would be repealed effective June 30, 2011.
Under Sec. 5,
ch. 6, SLA 2011, the date of the repeal was extended to June 30, 2015 (this date was later amended to June 30, 2018). However, the effective date of Sec. 5,
ch. 6, SLA 2011 was July 31, 2011.
Under sec. 1, ch. 8, SLA 2018, the date of the repeal was again extended to June 30, 2024.
However, the effective date of sec. 1, ch. 8, SLA 2018, was August 8, 2018.
The legal effect of sec. 5, ch. 6, SLA 2011, and sec. 1, ch. 8, SLA 2018, is uncertain. See
AS

01.10.090

and

01.10.100

for law concerning retroactivity and the effect of repeals and amendments.

E.O. No. 116, effective July 1, 2012, provided that “[s]ection 14 of this Order takes effect only if a bill is passed during the Second Session of the Twenty-Seventh Alaska State Legislature and enacted into law, so that
AS

47.45.306

is in effect on July 1, 2012.”
The Act extending the date of repeal for
AS

47.45.306

,
ch. 6, SLA 2011, was amended by a bill passed in the first session of the Twenty-Seventh Legislature.
It is not clear that the conditions in § 17 of E.O. No. 116 have been met.
However, the changes made in § 14 of E.O. No. 116 have been given effect in the text of the section.

Administrative Code. —

For senior benefits program, see 7 AAC 47, art. 3.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2012 amendment, effective July 1, 2012, substituted “office of administrative hearings (AS

44.64.010

)” for “department” following “may request a hearing before the”.

Sec. 47.45.308.
Ability to recover or recoup improper assistance or benefits.

An individual is liable to the department for the value of assistance or benefits improperly paid to the individual under AS

47.45.302

or former AS

47.45.310

or 47.45.320 if the improper payment was based on inaccurate or incomplete information provided by the individual. In a civil action brought by the state to recover from the individual the value of assistance or benefits improperly paid under AS

47.45.302

or former AS

47.45.310

or 47.45.320, the state may recover from the individual the costs of investigation and prosecution of the civil action, including attorney fees as determined under court rules.

History.

(§ 3 ch 1 FSSLA 2007)

Delayed repeal of section. —

Under sec. 4, ch. 1, FSSLA 2007, as amended by sec. 5, ch. 6, SLA 2011, sec. 1, ch. 113, SLA 2014, and sec. 1, ch. 8, SLA 2018, this section is repealed June 30, 2024.

Revisor’s notes. —

Section 4,
ch. 1, FSSLA 2007, provided that
AS

09.38.015(a)(11)

,
AS

47.45.301

,
AS

47.45.302

,

47.45.304

,

47.45.306

, this section, and

47.45.309

would be repealed effective June 30, 2011.
Under Sec. 5,
ch. 6, SLA 2011, the date of the repeal was extended to June 30, 2015 (this date was later amended to June 30, 2018). However, the effective date of Sec. 5,
ch. 6, SLA 2011 was July 31, 2011.
Under sec. 1, ch. 8, SLA 2018, the date of the repeal was again extended to June 30, 2024.
However, the effective date of sec. 1, ch. 8, SLA 2018, was August 8, 2018.
The legal effect of sec. 5, ch. 6, SLA 2011, and sec. 1, ch. 8, SLA 2018, is uncertain. See
AS

01.10.090

and

01.10.100

for law concerning retroactivity and the effect of repeals and amendments.

Administrative Code. —

For senior benefits program, see 7 AAC 47, art. 3.

Sec. 47.45.309.
Definitions.

In AS

47.45.301

—

47.45.309

,

“department” means the Department of Health and Social Services;

“eligible individual” means an individual who meets the requirements of AS

47.45.301

—

47.45.309

and regulations adopted under those statutes for eligibility for the program;

“family member” means a person who is

legally related to an eligible individual through marriage or guardianship; or

an eligible individual’s sibling, parent, grandparent, son, daughter, grandson, granddaughter, uncle, aunt, niece, nephew, or first cousin;

“program” means the senior benefits payment program established in AS

47.45.301

—

47.45.309

;

“resident” has the meaning given in AS

47.25.430(a)

.

History.

(§ 3 ch 1 FSSLA 2007)

Delayed repeal of section. —

Under sec. 4, ch. 1, FSSLA 2007, as amended by sec. 5, ch. 6, SLA 2011, sec. 1, ch. 113, SLA 2014, and sec. 1, ch. 8, SLA 2018, this section is repealed June 30, 2024.

Revisor’s notes. —

Section 4,
ch. 1, FSSLA 2007, provided that
AS

09.38.015(a)(11)

,
AS

47.45.301

,

47.45.302

,

47.45.304

,

47.45.306

,

47.45.308

, and this section would be repealed effective June 30, 2011.
Under Sec. 5,
ch. 6, SLA 2011, the date of the repeal was extended to June 30, 2015 (this date was later amended to June 30, 2018). However, the effective date of Sec. 5,
ch. 6, SLA 2011 was July 31, 2011.
Under sec. 1, ch. 8, SLA 2018, the date of the repeal was again extended to June 30, 2024.
However, the effective date of sec. 1, ch. 8, SLA 2018, was August 8, 2018.
The legal effect of sec. 5, ch. 6, SLA 2011, and sec. 1, ch. 8, SLA 2018, is uncertain.. See
AS

01.10.090

and

01.10.100

for law concerning retroactivity and the effect of repeals and amendments.

Administrative Code. —

For senior benefits program, see 7 AAC 47, art. 3.

Secs. 47.45.310 — 47.45.390.
Cash assistance benefit; prescription drug benefit; continuation of benefits; appeal rights; ability to recover or recoup improper assistance benefits; Alaska senior care fund; definitions. [Repealed, § 4 ch 89 SLA 2005.]